Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-317.01
State colleges; endowments and gifts; acceptance.

The Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges is authorized to receive, upon behalf of any of such state colleges and upon such terms and conditions as may be imposed, such gifts and endowments as the board may decide to accept. Such board shall be trustees of any such gifts and endowments.

Laws 1947, c. 354, § 1(2), p. 1105;

Laws 1969, c. 852, § 14, p. 3204.